Utah statutes.
63M-1-2608.   Detailed proposal -- Requirements -- Cooperation of affected department.

(1)  A detailed proposal submitted in response to a procurement process initiated under Section 63M-1-2607 shall include:

(a)  a conceptual description of the project, including the scope of the work;

(b)  a description of the economic benefit of the project to the state and the affected department;

(c)  an estimate of the design, implementation, operation, maintenance, or other costs associated with the project;

(d)  information concerning the information technology or telecommunication product and service or other supply or service currently provided by the state that is similar to the project being proposed, if applicable;

(e)  a statement setting forth the private entity's general plan for financing the project, including any appropriation by the Legislature or other public money and, if applicable, the sources of the private entity's funds and identification of any dedicated revenue source or proposed debt or equity investment on behalf of the private entity;

(f)  the name and address of the person who may be contacted for further information concerning the detailed proposal;

(g)  a statement describing the private entity's experience with other similar projects and a description of why the private entity is best qualified for the project; and

(h)  any other information:

(i)  reasonably requested by the affected department or the committee, or required by the board by rule; or

(ii)  that the private entity considers necessary or appropriate to complete or describe the detailed proposal.

(2)  To assist each private entity in preparing a detailed proposal:

(a)  the affected department shall provide each private entity with access to all information, records, documents, and reports related to the proposal and the project that are designated public records under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and

(b)  the affected department and the committee shall cooperate with each private entity to assist the private entity in the development of a detailed proposal that is:

(i)  practical;

(ii)  efficient; and

(iii)  economically beneficial to the state and the affected department.

(3)  The committee or any private entity may choose to terminate the development of the detailed proposal at any time before the submission of the detailed proposal to the chief procurement officer under Section 63G-6-408.5.

